Tennessee, session 114, HB0512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-7-403(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the following language:
The terms of members of the historic zoning commission shall be five (5) years,
except that the members appointed initially shall be appointed for staggered
terms so that the terms of at least one (1) member but not more than two (2)
members shall expire each year.
and substituting instead:
The terms of members of the historic zoning commission shall be six (6) years,
except that the members appointed initially shall be appointed for staggered
terms so that the terms of at least one (1) member but not more than two (2)
members shall expire each year.
SECTION 2. Members of historic zoning commissions on the effective date of this act
shall serve out the term for which they were elected, and their terms are not extended. As the
terms expire, the chief executive making appointments to fill vacancies on the historic zoning
commission shall appoint members to six-year terms.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0512
002215
- 1 -